California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
When real property has been sold pursuant to a levy, the purchaser of the property, or any person who has succeeded to the interest of the purchaser, may recover damages from the person causing the injury for injury to the property after levy and before possession is delivered to the purchaser or the person who has succeeded to the interest of the purchaser.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 58.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

747.

An action for the recovery of real property against a person in possession cannot be prejudiced by any alienation made by such person, either before or after the commencement of the action.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

748.

In actions respecting mining claims, proof must be admitted of the customs, usages, or regulations established and in force at the bar or diggings embracing such claim; and such customs, usages, or regulations, when not in conflict with the laws of this State, must govern the decision of the action.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

749.

(a) In an action for damages by a homeowner or trustor against a beneficiary of a trust deed on real property consisting of a single-family residence containing not more than four dwelling units, or against an assignee or successor in interest thereof, wherein it is established the trust deed was forged in whole or in part by the beneficiary, judgment may be entered for three times the amount at which the actual damages are assessed.

(b) An assignee or successor in interest of a beneficiary or a transferee of a prior assignee or of a prior successor in interest shall not
 be subject to treble damages unless it is established that the person purchased or obtained the deed of trust with actual knowledge of the forgery of the deed of trust.

(c) This section shall not apply to any person who does not purchase and sell four or more deeds of trust in any calendar year.

(d) This section shall not limit or affect the availability of punitive damages, if any, to the injured party.

(e) This section shall apply to any action filed on or after July 1, 1983, provided that any action filed prior to the effective date of this section is pending at that time in the court of original jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1397, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

749.5.

(a) In an action for damages by an assignee or a successor in interest against a beneficiary of a trust deed on real property consisting of a single-family residence containing not more than four dwelling units, wherein it is established the trust deed was forged in whole or in part by the beneficiary, judgment may be entered for three times the amount at which the actual damages are assessed.

(b) This section shall not apply to any person who does not purchase and sell four or more deeds of trust in any calendar year.

(c) This section shall not limit or affect the availability of punitive damages, if any, to the injured party.

(d) This section shall apply to any action filed on or after January 1, 1984.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1397, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Actions to Re-establish Destroyed Land Records [751.01. - 751.28.]

751.01.

This chapter may be cited as the Destroyed Land Records Relief Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

751.02.

Whenever the public records in the office of the county recorder of any county are lost or destroyed in whole or in any material part by flood, fire, earthquake, enemy attack, or from any other cause, any person who claims an estate of inheritance or for life in, and who is by himself, or his tenant or other person holding under him in the actual and peaceable possession of, any real property in the county may bring and maintain an action in rem against all the world, in the superior court for the county in which such real property is situate, to establish his title to such property and to determine all adverse claims thereto.

Such action may also be brought in the county in which the real property is situate if any real property is in another county, but was formerly in the county of which all or a material part of the records were so lost or destroyed, and if the lost or destroyed records included all or a material part of the public records in the office of the county recorder covering all or a material part of the time when the real property was in the county whose records were so lost or destroyed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

751.03.

Any number of separate parcels of land claimed by the plaintiff may be included in the same action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

751.04.

The action shall be commenced by the filing of a verified complaint. The party commencing the action shall be named as plaintiff, and the defendants shall be described as “all persons claiming any interest in, or lien upon, the real property herein described, or any part thereof.” The complaint shall contain a statement of the facts enumerated in Section 751.02, a particular description of the real property, and a specification of the estate, title, or interest of the plaintiff in the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

751.05.

Upon the filing of the complaint, a summons shall be issued under the seal of the court. The summons shall contain the name of the court and county in which the action is brought, and the name of the plaintiff and a particular description of the real property involved, and shall be directed to “all persons claiming any interest in, or lien upon, the real property herein described, or any part thereof,” as defendants, and shall be substantially in the following form:“IN THE SUPERIOR COURT OF THE STATE OF CALIFORNIA IN
 AND
FOR THE COUNTY (OR CITY AND COUNTY) OF _______

__________________________,⎫ Action No. _______Plaintiff,⎪vs.⎪All Persons Claiming Any Interest in, or⎬ Lien Upon, the Real Property Herein⎪ Described or Any Part thereof,⎪Defendants.⎭The people of the State of California, to all persons claiming any interest in, or lien upon, the real property herein described, or any part thereof, defendants, greeting:You are hereby required to appear and answer the complaint of ____________, plaintiff, filed with the clerk of the above-entitled court and county, within three months after the first publication of this summons, and to set forth what interest or lien, if any, you have in or upon that certain real property or any part thereof, situated in the County (or City and County)
 of __________, State of California, particularly described as follows: (here insert description.)And you are hereby notified that, unless you so appear and answer, the plaintiff will apply to the court for the relief demanded in the complaint, to wit: (here insert a statement of the relief so demanded.)Witness my hand and the seal of said court, this ________ day of __________, A.D. ________.(SEAL)______________ _______________, Clerk.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

751.06.

The summons shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the action is brought. The newspaper in which publication is to be made shall be designated by an order of the court or a judge thereof to be signed and filed with the clerk. No other order for the publication of the summons shall be necessary, nor shall any affidavit therefor be required, nor need any copy of the complaint be served, except as required by this chapter. The summons shall be published pursuant to Section 6065 of the Government Code, and to each publication thereof shall be appended a memorandum in substance as follows:

“The first publication of this summons was made in ____ (here insert name) newspaper on the ____ day of ____ A.D. ____,” (inserting the date).

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

751.07.

If the affidavit provided for in Section 751.09 discloses the name of any person claiming an interest in the property or a lien thereon adverse to the plaintiff, that fact and the name and address, if given, of the person shall be stated in a memorandum to be appended to the summons in substance as follows:

“The following persons are said to claim an interest in, or lien upon, said property adverse to plaintiff,” (giving their names and addresses as above provided).

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

751.08.

A copy of the summons and a copy of the memorandum shall be posted in a conspicuous place on each separate parcel of the property described in the complaint within 15 days after the first publication of the summons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

751.09.

At the time of filing the complaint the plaintiff shall file with it his affidavit fully and explicitly setting forth and showing:

(a) The character of the plaintiff’s estate, right, title, interest, or claim in, and possession of, the property, the period it has existed, and from whom obtained.

(b) Whether or not the plaintiff has ever made any conveyance of all or any part of the property, or any interest therein, and if so when and to whom, and a statement of any and all subsisting mortgages, deeds of trust, and other liens thereon.

(c) That the plaintiff does not know and has never been informed of any other person who claims or who may claim any interest in or lien upon all or any part of the property adversely to the plaintiff, or if the plaintiff does know or has been informed of any such person, the name and address of such person.

If the plaintiff is unable to state any of the required matters, the plaintiff shall set forth and show fully and explicitly the reasons for such inability. Such affidavit shall constitute a part of the judgment-roll. If the plaintiff is a corporation, the affidavit shall be made by an officer thereof. If the plaintiff is a person under guardianship or conservatorship, the affidavit shall be made by the guardian or conservator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

751.10.

If the affidavit discloses the name of any person claiming any interest in or lien upon the property adverse to the plaintiff, a copy of the summons and complaint and affidavit shall also be served upon such person, if he can be found, in the manner provided by law for the service of a summons in a civil action, other than by publication. Service shall be made during the period of the publication of the summons. A copy of the memorandum provided for in Section 751.07 shall be appended to the copy of the summons served upon any such person.

If such person cannot, with reasonable diligence, be served as provided above within the
 period of publication of the summons, a copy of the summons, memorandum, complaint, and affidavit shall be mailed, postage prepaid, addressed to him at the address given in the affidavit, or, if no address is given, at his last address known to the plaintiff, or, if none, at the county seat of the county in which the action is brought, forthwith upon the expiration of the period of publication.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1611.)
-------------------------------------------

751.11.

Upon the completion of the publication and posting of the summons and its service or mailing as provided for in Section 751.10, the court has complete jurisdiction over the plaintiff and the property and the person of everyone having or claiming any estate, right, title, or interest in or to, or lien upon, all or any part of the property, and shall be deemed to have obtained the possession and control of the property for the purposes of the action with complete jurisdiction to render the judgment provided for in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1611.)
-------------------------------------------

751.12.

At any time within three months after the first publication of the summons, or such further time not exceeding 30 days as the court for good cause may grant, any person having or claiming any estate, right, title, or interest in or to, or lien upon, all or any part of the property may appear and make himself a party to the action by pleading to the complaint. All answers must be verified and must specifically set forth the estate, right, title, interest, or lien so claimed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

751.13.

At the time of filing the complaint the plaintiff, and at the time of filing his or her answer every defendant claiming any affirmative relief, shall record in the office of the recorder of the county in which the property is situated a notice of the pendency of the action containing the object of the action or defense, and a particular description of the property affected by it. The recorder shall record the notice in the same manner as provided in Section 409.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 843, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

751.14.

Judgment in any such action shall not be given by default, but the court must require proof of the facts alleged in the complaint and other pleadings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

751.15.

The judgment shall determine all estates, rights, titles, interests, and claims in and to such property and every part thereof, whether legal or equitable, present or future, vested or contingent, or whether they consist of mortgages or liens of any description. It shall be conclusive upon every person who at the commencement of the action had or claimed any estate, right, title, or interest in or to all or any part of such property and upon every person claiming under him by title subsequent to the commencement of the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

751.16.

A certified copy of the judgment shall be recorded in the office of the recorder of the county in which the action was commenced. Any party or the successor in interest of any party to the action may file the entire judgment roll for record in the office of the county recorder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

751.17.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all rules of law relating to evidence, pleading, practice, new trials, and appeals applicable to other civil actions shall apply to actions authorized by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

751.18.

At any time after the issuance of summons, any party to the action may take depositions in conformity to law upon notice to the adverse party sought to be bound by such depositions and who has appeared in the action and upon notice filed with the clerk. The depositions may be used by any party against any other party giving or receiving the notice, subject to all just exceptions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

751.19.

The clerk shall number all actions authorized by this chapter consecutively in a distinct series and shall keep an index and register devoted exclusively to such actions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

751.20.

Whenever judgment in an action authorized by this chapter has been entered as to any real property, no other action relative to all or any part of the same property shall be tried until proof has first been made to the court that all persons who appeared in the first action or their successors in interest have been personally served pursuant to this chapter either within or without the State more than one month before the time to plead expired.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

751.21.

An executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, or other person holding the possession of property in the right of another may maintain as plaintiff, and may appear and defend in, any action provided for by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

751.22.

The remedies provided for by this chapter are cumulative and in addition to any other remedy provided by law for quieting or establishing title to real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

751.23.

Where the title to real property may be established or quieted pursuant to this chapter, any person who is or claims to be the owner of such real property or of any interest therein or lien thereon, by himself or by his agent duly authorized by letter of attorney theretofore recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county where the property is situated, may sign, verify, and file for record in the office of the county recorder a notice in substantially the following form:
“Notice of Ownership and Claim to Real
 Property Under the Destroyed Records Relief Law

“Notice is hereby given that ____ (here insert name of claimant) ____, whose residence is at ____ (here insert street and number, city or town, county and state of residence), is the owner of an interest in the real property situated in the ____ (here insert name of city if the property be located in a city) ____, county of ____ (here insert name of county or city and county in which property is located) ____, State of California, described as follows: ____ (here insert a particular description of real property) ____.

“The character of the interest in the real property owned by the claimant is ____ (here insert description of the character of interest in or lien upon the real property)
 ____ and the interest was obtained from ____ (here insert the name of the party from whom the interest was obtained) ____, and at the time and in the manner following ____ (here insert time at which and manner in which the interest was acquired) ____.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

751.24.

The notice shall be signed by the claimant or by his agent and shall be verified by the oath of the party signing it, to the effect that all of the statements therein contained are true to his knowledge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

751.25.

Upon the filing of the notice for recordation the recorder shall record the notice in the same manner as provided in Section 409.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 843, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

751.26.

After three days after the notice has been filed for record, all persons who may begin actions pursuant to this chapter shall be deemed to have notice of the facts stated in the notice. Neither the filing of the notice for record nor its recordation constitute constructive notice to any other person or for any other purpose. The original of the notice shall be returned to the party requesting the recordation as provided in Section 27321 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 843, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

751.27.

After three days after the filing of the notice for record, any person who begins an action pursuant to this chapter to perfect or establish his title to the real property described in the notice, or any interest therein, must name, in the affidavit and memorandum appended to the summons, the claimant in the notice, or any person who is a successor in interest of such claimant under a subsequently duly recorded written instrument, judgment, or decree, as a party who claims an interest in or lien upon the property adverse to the plaintiff. He must cause such claimant, or successor in interest, to be served with summons in the action. Otherwise neither the action nor any
 judgment or decree made therein shall affect the title or interest in the property described in the notice and owned by the claimant at the time of the filing of the notice, or by any such successor in interest prior to the commencement of the action. The failure to name such claimant or successor in interest in the affidavit or memorandum or to serve such claimant or such successor in interest shall not affect the validity of the judgment or decree rendered in such action as to any other persons, but such judgment or decree shall be valid and binding upon all persons except such claimant or successor in interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

751.28.

An executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, or other person holding the possession of property in the right of another, may make, sign, verify, and file for record the notice and affidavit provided for in this chapter on behalf of the estate or interest which he represents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.6. Cullen Earthquake Act [751.50. - 751.65.]

751.50.

If the boundaries of land owned either by public or by private entities have been disturbed by earth movements such as, but not limited to, slides, subsidence, lateral or vertical displacements or similar disasters caused by man, or by earthquake or other acts of God, so that such lands are in a location different from that at which they were located prior to the disaster, an action in rem may be brought to equitably reestablish boundaries and to quiet title to land within the boundaries so reestablished.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 936.)
-------------------------------------------

751.51.

(a) An action authorized by this chapter may be commenced by:

(1) A county in which lands were affected by a disaster described in Section 751.50 with or without the joinder of a city or cities included in the county and within the area so affected.

(2) A city, if the disaster has affected land in the city.

(3) Any other entity or person owning or having an interest in or lien upon land affected by the disaster if granted permission by the court to bring the
 action, and if the county in which the land is located is made a party to the action.

(b) In an action authorized by this chapter every entity in actual and peaceable possession of, or having an estate or interest in or lien upon any of the land affected by the action, whose possession or evidence of estate or interest is either recorded or known to the plaintiffs, the city, if the land is within a city, the county in which the land is located, and the State of California must be designated in the complaint of the action, and given notice in the manner required by this chapter.

(c) All unknown entities, including owners, lien or interest claimants, heirs, devisees, legatees or assigns, may be described in the caption and complaint as “all entities claiming any interest in or lien upon, the real property herein described or any part of it.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 936.)
-------------------------------------------

751.52.

An entity which is a permissive plaintiff under this chapter, may bring a separate action with respect to separate portions of the disaster area of sufficient size to equitably reestablish boundaries without harm to other areas of the common disaster, its decision regarding the desirability of the separate action, and regarding the area to be dealt with in each action to be approved by the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 936.)
-------------------------------------------

751.53.

The complaint shall substantially include:

(a) A statement of the facts which make the provisions of this chapter applicable.

(b) A description of the exterior boundaries of the real property area sought to be affected by the action.

(c) A specification of the estate, title, interest or claim owned, and in the actual possession of the plaintiff or plaintiffs in described parts of the entire real property sought to be affected by the action.

(d) A specification of the estate, title, interest, or claim, so far as they are known to the plaintiffs or either of them, and so far as they are capable of being discovered by reasonably diligent search by the plaintiff or plaintiffs, in each separate part of the entire real property sought to be affected by the action.

(e) A specification of the street areas sought to be vacated or offered by the plaintiff, or plaintiffs, to be vacated in whole or in part for judicial equitable allocation to landowners for the mitigation of the losses inflicted upon the landowners by the particular disaster or disasters to which this chapter is applicable.

(f) A proposed replatting of the entire real property sought to be affected by the action, embodying the land boundaries as fixed by the disaster, except as these boundaries have
 been equitably and judicially readjusted, or as liberalized by judicially directed use of the vacated lands.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

751.54.

Summons, publication of notice, posting and related matters and procedures shall be governed by the provisions of Sections 751.05 through 751.10, inclusive, of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 936.)
-------------------------------------------

751.55.

Upon the completion of the service, publication and posting of the summons, as may be required by this chapter, the court has complete jurisdiction over the parties plaintiff or plaintiffs and the entire real property described in the complaint as intended to be affected by the action, and over every entity having or claiming an estate, right, title or interest in or to, or lien upon, all or any part of the property, and shall be considered to have obtained the possession and control of the property for the purposes of the action with complete jurisdiction to render the judgment provided for in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 936.)
-------------------------------------------

751.56.

(a) An answer to the complaint must be served within 90 days after the first publication of the notice, or such further time not exceeding 30 days, as the court for good cause may grant.

(b) An answer must:

(1) Specifically set out the particulars in which the claimant’s estate, right, title, or interest in or to, or lien upon all or any part of the property is different from, or greater than, the interest of the claimant as it is described in the complaint.

(2) Be confined to rights based on events occurring at the time of, or since the time of the disaster.

(c) To whatever extent, if at all, the answering party has rights against anyone whatsoever, based upon facts or events which occurred before the disaster, the claims shall remain unaffected by the action brought under this chapter and shall be assertable subsequent to the conclusion of the action at any time and in any manner permitted by law, notwithstanding the judgment granted in this action, recognizing however the finality of this judgment as to the consequences, with respect to land boundaries as applicable to land in the disaster area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 936.)
-------------------------------------------

751.57.

A party to an action authorized by this chapter may file a notice of the pendency of the action in the form and at the place and with the effects specified by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 936.)
-------------------------------------------

751.58.

The vacating of streets, highways or other public ways within or abutting the area affected by the disaster, in whole or in part, by the voluntary action of the governmental agency under whose jurisdiction the streets, highways, or ways are vested, for the purpose of making it possible for the court to mitigate the hardships suffered by entities because of the change in land boundaries caused by the disaster can be accomplished by the affected governmental agency expressing the offer in the proceedings followed by the court’s acceptance thereof in an action authorized by this chapter, without complying with any other formalities of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 936.)
-------------------------------------------

751.59.

In an action of the type authorized by this chapter, judgment shall not be given by default, but the court must require proof of the facts alleged in the complaint and other pleadings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 936.)
-------------------------------------------

751.60.

The judgment shall:

(a) Determine the land boundaries of each parcel of land located within the entire area of real property sought to be affected by the action, whether owned publicly or privately, as fixed by the disaster, except as these boundaries have been judicially and equitably readjusted and as liberalized by judicial equitable allocation of lands voluntarily vacated by a city, county or the state under this act.

(b) Determine the entity or entities having estates, rights, titles, interests and claims in and to each parcel, whether
 legal or equitable, present or future, vested or contingent, or whether they consist of mortgages or liens of any description.

(c) Approve and direct the proper filing of an official map covering the entire area of real property sought to be affected by the action, as a substitute for the plat maps previously filed, but rendered inaccurate by the disaster.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 936.)
-------------------------------------------

751.61.

In reaching the conclusions called for by Section 751.60, the court shall give effect to the changes in land boundaries caused by the disaster, mitigated, however, so far as can equitably be done by adjustment of land boundaries and by allocating to contiguous lots parts of the land released by a city, county or the state by its voluntary vacation of areas formerly constituting public ways, which vacatings of streets shall be approved by the judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 936.)
-------------------------------------------

751.62.

The judgment shall be conclusive with respect to land boundaries upon every entity who at the commencement of the action had or claimed an estate, right, title or interest in or to or lien upon a part of the entire area of real property described in the complaint as intended to be affected by the action, and upon every entity claiming under any such person by title subsequent to the commencement of the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 936.)
-------------------------------------------

751.63.

A certified copy of the judgment shall be recorded, at the expense of the plaintiff or plaintiffs in the action, in the office of the recorder of the county in which the affected land is situated and shall constitute constructive notice of the findings therein and of the official plat or plats referred to therein, which findings and plats shall supersede and control all prior plats, maps and documents to the extent inconsistent therewith.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 936.)
-------------------------------------------

751.64.

The remedies provided for by this chapter are cumulative and in addition to any other remedy provided by law for quieting or establishing title to real property or the boundaries of it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 936.)
-------------------------------------------

751.65.

This chapter may be cited as the Cullen Earthquake Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 936.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Quiet Title [760.010. - 765.060.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [760.010. - 760.060.]

760.010.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Claim” includes a legal or equitable right, title, estate, lien, or interest in property or cloud upon title.

(b) “Property” includes real property, and to the extent applicable, personal property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

760.020.

(a) An action may be brought under this chapter to establish title against adverse claims to real or personal property or any interest therein.

(b) An action may be brought under this chapter by parties to an agreement entered into pursuant to Section 6307 or 6357 of the Public Resources Code to confirm the validity of the agreement.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the right of members of the public to bring or participate in actions challenging the validity of agreements
entered into pursuant to Section 6307 or 6357 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1045, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

760.030.

(a) The remedy provided in this chapter is cumulative and not exclusive of any other remedy, form or right of action, or proceeding provided by law for establishing or quieting title to property.

(b) In an action or proceeding in which establishing or quieting title to property is in issue the court in its discretion may, upon motion of any party, require that the issue be resolved pursuant to the provisions of this chapter to the extent practicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

760.040.

(a) The superior court has jurisdiction of actions under this chapter.

(b) The court has complete jurisdiction over the parties to the action and the property described in the complaint and is deemed to have obtained possession and control of the property for the purposes of the action with complete jurisdiction to render the judgment provided for in this chapter.

(c) Nothing in this chapter limits any authority the court may have to grant such equitable relief as may be proper under the circumstances
of the case.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

760.050.

Subject to the power of the court to transfer actions, the proper county for the trial of an action under this chapter is:

(a) Where the subject of the action is real property or real and personal property, the county in which the real property, or some part thereof, is located. 

(b) Where the subject of the action is personal property, the county in which the personal property is principally located at the commencement of the action or in which the defendants, or any of them, reside at the commencement of the
action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

760.060.

The statutes and rules governing practice in civil actions generally apply to actions under this chapter except where they are inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Commencement of Action [761.010. - 761.040.]

761.010.

(a) An action under this chapter is commenced by filing a complaint with the court.

(b) Immediately upon commencement of the action, the plaintiff shall file a notice of the pendency of the action in the office of the county recorder of each county in which any real property described in the complaint is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

761.020.

The complaint shall be verified and shall include all of the following:

(a) A description of the property that is the subject of the action. In the case of tangible personal property, the description shall include its usual location. In the case of real property, the description shall include both its legal description and its street address or common designation, if any.

(b) The title of the plaintiff as to which a determination under this chapter is sought and the basis of the title. If the title is based upon adverse
possession, the complaint shall allege the specific facts constituting the adverse possession.

(c) The adverse claims to the title of the plaintiff against which a determination is sought.

(d) The date as of which the determination is sought. If the determination is sought as of a date other than the date the complaint is filed, the complaint shall include a statement of the reasons why a determination as of that date is sought.

(e) A prayer for the determination of the title of the plaintiff against the adverse claims.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

761.030.

(a) The answer shall be verified and shall set forth:

(1) Any claim the defendant has.

(2) Any facts tending to controvert such material allegations of the complaint as the defendant does not wish to be taken as true.

(3) A statement of any new matter constituting a defense.

(b) If the defendant disclaims in the answer any claim, or suffers judgment to be taken without
answer, the plaintiff shall not recover costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

761.040.

(a) The defendant may by cross-complaint seek affirmative relief in the action.

(b) If the defendant seeks a determination of title as of a date other than the date specified in the complaint, the cross-complaint shall include the date and a statement of the reasons why a determination as of that date is sought.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Defendants [762.010. - 762.090.]

762.010.

The plaintiff shall name as defendants in the action the persons having adverse claims to the title of the plaintiff against which a determination is sought.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 44, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

762.020.

(a) If the name of a person required to be named as a defendant is not known to the plaintiff, the plaintiff shall so state in the complaint and shall name as parties all persons unknown in the manner provided in Section 762.060.

(b) If the claim or the share or quantity of the claim of a person required to be named as a defendant is unknown, uncertain, or contingent, the plaintiff shall so state in the complaint. If the lack of knowledge, uncertainty, or contingency is caused by a transfer to an unborn or unascertained beneficiary or class member, or by a transfer in the form of a contingent remainder, vested remainder subject to defeasance, executory interest, or similar disposition, the plaintiff shall also state in the
 complaint, so far as is known to the plaintiff, the name, age, and legal disability (if any) of the person in being who would be entitled to the claim had the contingency upon which the claim depends occurred prior to the commencement of the action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 260, Sec. 7.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

762.030.

(a) If a person required to be named as a defendant is dead and the plaintiff knows of a personal representative, the plaintiff shall join the personal representative as a defendant.

(b) If a person required to be named as a defendant is dead, or is believed by the plaintiff to be dead, and the plaintiff knows of no personal representative:

(1) The plaintiff shall state these facts in an affidavit filed with the complaint.

(2) Where it